Hawaii statutes.
[TITLE
25A. GENERAL BUSINESS PROVISIONS]

Chapter

474 Business Action Center

[CHAPTER
474]

BUSINESS
ACTION CENTER

Section

474-1 Definitions

474-2 Business action center established; staff

474-3 General functions; powers and duties

474-4 Cooperation from state agencies

474-5 Comprehensive permit and license information
file

474-6 Immunity from liability

474-7 Compilation of statistical data; annual
report

Note

Transfer of functions, duties, etc. L 2005, c 62, §§4 to 8.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next